Nevada, session 83, AB219.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 368A.220 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
368A.220 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section:
(a) Each taxpayer who is a licensed gaming establishment shall
file with the Board, on or before the 15th day of each month, a
report showing the amount of all taxable receipts for the preceding
month or the month in which the taxable events occurred. The report
must be in a form prescribed by the Board.
(b) All other taxpayers shall file with the Department, on or
before the last day of each month, a report showing the amount of
all taxable receipts for the preceding month. The report must be in a
form prescribed by the Department.
2. The Board or the Department, if it deems it necessary to
ensure payment to or facilitate the collection by the State of the tax
imposed by NRS 368A.200, may require reports to be filed not later
than 10 days after the end of each calendar quarter.
3. Each report required to be filed by this section must be
accompanied by the amount of the tax that is due for the period
covered by the report.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the Board
and the Department shall deposit all taxes, interest and penalties
they receive pursuant to this chapter in the State Treasury for credit
to [the State General Fund. On or before October 1 of each year, the
Department shall deposit $150,000 from the taxes, interest and
penalties it receives pursuant to this chapter in the State Treasury for
credit to the] :
(a) The Nevada Arts Council created by NRS 233C.025 [.] until
the amount deposited in the State Treasury for credit to the
Nevada Arts Council is equal to 1 percent of all taxes, interest and
penalties received by the Department and the Board pursuant to
this chapter in the immediately preceding fiscal year. [The] At
least 90 percent of the amount deposited in the State Treasury for
credit to the Nevada Arts Council pursuant to this [subsection]
-
*AB219_R1*

– 3 –
paragraph [is hereby authorized for expenditure] must be used by
the Nevada Arts Council [as a continuing appropriation.] to provide
grants to artists and local arts agencies in this State.
(b) The State General Fund after the requirement of
paragraph (a) has been satisfied.
5. It is the intent of the Legislature that money deposited in
the State Treasury for credit to the Nevada Arts Council pursuant
to this section not be used to replace or supplant funding available
from other sources, including, without limitation, legislative
appropriations.
6. As used in this section, “local arts agency” means a public
or private nonprofit organization with the primary purpose of
making arts and culture more accessible to the public by
supporting local artists, art programming or local organizations
focused on arts and culture.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB219_R1*